Hawaii, session 2026, SB141.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that disaster preparedness is of utmost importance for the safety and well being of state residents. The legislature recognizes that Taiwan has established September 21 as National Disaster Prevention Day, which was initiated after the devastating Jiji earthquake occurred on that day in 1999, in which two thousand five hundred people were killed.  For National Disaster Prevention Day, Taiwan engages in drills in an effort to ensure disaster preparedness and to save human lives. The legislature believes that Hawaii should have a similar day. The purpose of this Act is to establish the eighth day of August of each year as Hawaii disaster drill day. SECTION 2. Chapter 127A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§127A-     Hawaii disaster drill day.  (a)  The eighth day of August of each year shall be known and designated as Hawaii disaster drill day. (b)  On Hawaii disaster drill day, the Hawaii emergency management agency, in coordination with all state departments and agencies, including the university of Hawaii, department of education, and department of land and natural resources, shall: (1)  Conduct drills intended to prepare residents, as necessary, for disasters, including hurricanes, tsunamis, wildfires, and volcanic eruptions; (2)  Educate the public on safety measures; (3)  Encourage residents to prepare for effective emergency responses; and (4)  Encourage federal agencies, county agencies, and private businesses to participate in and coordinate with the Hawaii emergency management agency regarding Hawaii disaster drill day. (c)  Hawaii disaster drill day is not and shall not be construed to be a state holiday." SECTION 3. This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 4. New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________